Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1026
Power supply plan; research and conservation report; contents.

The representative organization shall file, at the request of the board but no more often than biennially, a research and conservation report, which shall include the following information relative to programs enacted by the representative organization and its members:

(1) Research and development;

(2) Energy conservation;

(3) Load management;

(4) Renewable energy sources; and

(5) Cogeneration.

Laws 1981, LB 302, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 948, § 2.